Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Program

§ 57-1-301.
Local governments capital improvements revolving loan program established; “capital improvements” defined.

There is established a local governments capital improvements revolving loan program to be administered by the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of assisting counties and municipalities in making capital improvements.

For purposes of Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335, “capital improvements” include any combination of the following:

Construction or repair of water and sewer facilities;

Construction or repair of drainage systems for industrial development;

Improvements in fire protection;

Construction of new buildings for economic development purposes;

Renovation or repair of existing buildings for economic development purposes;

Construction or repair of access roads for industrial development;

Purchase of buildings for economic development purposes;

Construction or repair of railroad spurs for industrial development;

Construction of any county or municipally owned health care facilities, excluding any county health departments;

Construction, purchase, renovation or repair of any building to be utilized as an auditorium or convention center;

Construction of multipurpose facilities for tourism development;

Loans to a county to aid in retiring interest-bearing loans utilized for the purchase of a motion picture sound stage;

Construction, repair and renovation of parks, swimming pools and recreational and athletic facilities; or

Remediation of brownfield agreement sites in accordance with Sections 49-35-1 through 49-35-25.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 517, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 534, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 548, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 497, § 4, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§ 57-1-303.
Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund; loan program; pledge for repayment of loan by county or municipality; audit of county or municipality where loan payments in arrears; applicability of debt limitations; renegotiation of certain loans [Subsection (1)(a)(ii) repealed effective July 1, 2022].

(i) There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be designated as the “Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund,” which fund shall consist of such monies as provided in Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335. The fund shall be maintained in perpetuity for the purposes established in Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund may not be used or expended for any purpose except as authorized under Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335.

Monies in the Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund which are derived from interest on loan payments received by the Mississippi Development Authority after January 1, 2002, for loans funded with proceeds of bonds whose interest is not exempt from income taxation under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code may be used by the Mississippi Development Authority for the ordinary and necessary general support of the Mississippi Development Authority. However, such monies may not be used for the purpose of providing salary increases for Mississippi Development Authority employees. The Mississippi Development Authority may escalate its budget and expend such monies in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration in a manner consistent with the escalation of federal funds. This subparagraph (ii) shall be repealed from and after July 1, 2022.

The Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund shall be divided into the Taxable Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Subaccount and the Nontaxable Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Subaccount. Funds allocated to the Nontaxable Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Subaccount shall be utilized to provide loans for capital improvements that would qualify for the issuance of bonds whose interest is exempt from income taxation under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code. Funds allocated to the Taxable Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Subaccount shall be utilized to provide loans for any eligible capital improvements, including, but not limited to, capital improvements that would qualify for the issuance of bonds whose interest is exempt from income taxation under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.

Of the funds deposited into the Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund, not less than Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00) shall be allocated to the Nontaxable Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Subaccount, and the remainder of such funds shall be allocated to the Taxable Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Subaccount.

A county or an incorporated municipality may apply to the Mississippi Development Authority for a loan under the local governments capital improvements revolving loan program established under Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish a loan program by which loans, at the rate of interest provided for in paragraph (b) of this subsection, may be made available to counties and incorporated municipalities to assist counties and incorporated municipalities in making capital improvements. Loans from the revolving fund may be made to counties and municipalities as set forth in a loan agreement in amounts not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of eligible project costs as established by the Mississippi Development Authority. The Mississippi Development Authority may require county or municipal participation or funding from other sources, or otherwise limit the percentage of costs covered by loans from the revolving fund. The Mississippi Development Authority may establish a maximum amount for any loan in order to provide for broad and equitable participation in the program and loans for projects described in Section 57-1-301(1)(m) shall not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) per project.

(i) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (b), the rate of interest on loans made from the Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund for capital improvements that would qualify for the issuance of bonds whose interest is exempt from income taxation under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code shall be at the rate of three percent (3%) per annum, calculated according to the actuarial method. The rate of interest on loans for all other capital improvements shall be at the true interest cost on the most recent issue of twenty-year state general obligation bonds occurring prior to the date such loan is made.

The rate of interest on loans made after April 9, 2002, from the Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund for capital improvements that would qualify for the issuance of bonds whose interest is exempt from income taxation under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code shall be at the rate of the lesser of two percent (2%) per annum, calculated according to the actuarial method, or the true interest cost on the most recent issue of state general obligation bonds occurring prior to the date such loan is made. The rate of interest on loans made after April 9, 2002, for all other capital improvements shall be at the rate of three percent (3%) per annum, calculated according to the actuarial method.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph to the contrary, loans made for the purposes of the capital project described in Section 57-1-301(2)(l) shall bear no interest.

A county that receives a loan from the revolving fund shall pledge for repayment of the loan any part of the homestead exemption annual tax loss reimbursement to which it may be entitled under Section 27-33-77. An incorporated municipality that receives a loan from the revolving fund shall pledge for repayment of the loan any part of the sales tax revenue distribution to which it may be entitled under Section 27-65-75. Each loan agreement shall provide for (i) monthly payments, (ii) semiannual payments, or (iii) other periodic payments, the annual total of which shall not exceed the annual total for any other year of the loan by more than fifteen percent (15%). The loan agreement shall provide for the repayment of all funds received within not more than twenty (20) years from the date of project completion.

The State Auditor, upon request of the Mississippi Development Authority, shall audit the receipts and expenditures of a county or an incorporated municipality whose loan payments appear to be in arrears, and if he finds that the county or municipality is in arrears in such payments, he shall immediately notify the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration who shall withhold all future payments to the county of homestead exemption reimbursements under Section 27-33-77 and all sums allocated to the county or the municipality under Section 27-65-75 until such time as the county or the municipality is again current in its loan payments as certified by the Mississippi Development Authority.

Evidences of indebtedness which are issued pursuant to this chapter shall not be deemed indebtedness within the meaning specified in Section 21-33-303 with regard to cities or incorporated towns, and in Section 19-9-5 with regard to counties.

There is created a special fund in the State Treasury to be designated as the “Local Governments Brownfields Redevelopment Grant Fund.” The fund shall consist of those monies as provided in Section 57-1-307. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund may not be used or expended for any purpose except as authorized in this section. From and after July 1, 2009, the Local Governments Brownfields Redevelopment Grant Fund is abolished and all money in the fund shall be transferred to the Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund.

The Mississippi Development Authority may, on a case-by-case basis, renegotiate the payment of principal and interest on loans made under Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335 to the six (6) most southern counties of the state covered by the Presidential Declaration of Major Disaster for the State of Mississippi (FEMA-1604-DR) dated August 29, 2005, and to political subdivisions located in such counties; however, the interest on the loans shall not be forgiven for a period of more than twenty-four (24) months and the maturity of the loans shall not be extended for a period of more than forty-eight (48) months.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 2; Laws, 1995, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 534, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 548, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 497, § 5; Laws, 2006, ch. 545, § 6; Laws, 2007, ch. 388, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 557, § 13; Laws, 2010, ch. 458, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 346, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2019, ch. 348, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 57-1-305.
General powers and duties of department.

In administering the provisions of Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335, the Department of Economic and Community Development shall have the following powers and duties:

To supervise the use of all funds made available under Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335 for local governments capital improvements;

To review and certify all projects for which funds are authorized to be made available under Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335 for local governments capital improvements;

To requisition monies in the Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund and distribute those monies on a project-by-project basis in accordance with the provisions of Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335;

To insure that the funds made available to a county or an incorporated municipality under Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335 provide for an equitable distribution of projects and funds among the counties and incorporated municipalities;

To maintain an accurate record of all local governments capital improvements funds made available to counties and municipalities and the costs for each project.

To adopt and promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable for the purpose of implementing the provisions of Sections 57-1-301 through 57-1-335; and

To file annually with the Legislature a report detailing how monies in the Local Governments Capital Improvements Revolving Loan Fund were spent during the preceding fiscal year in each county and incorporated municipality, the number of projects approved and constructed, and the cost of each project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-307.
Bonds; resolution for issuance; disposition of bond sale proceeds and investment earnings generally.

The State Bond Commission, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for all costs incurred or to be incurred for the purposes described in Section 57-1-303. Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Mississippi Development Authority, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this section, the Mississippi Development Authority shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the State Bond Commission. Upon receipt of such resolution, the State Bond Commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. The total amount of bonds issued under Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 shall not exceed One Hundred Fifteen Million Dollars ($115,000,000.00); provided, however, that an additional amount of bonds may be issued under Sections 57-1-307 and 57-1-335 in an amount not to exceed Thirteen Million Dollars ($13,000,000.00), and the proceeds of any such additional amount of bonds so issued shall be utilized solely to provide loans for capital improvements that would qualify for the issuance of bonds whose interest is exempt from income taxation under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.

Proceeds from the sale of bonds shall be deposited in the special fund created in Section 57-1-303. Any investment earnings on amounts deposited into the special fund created in Section 57-1-303 shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 534, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 577, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 584, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 497, § 6; Laws, 2009, ch. 557, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2009.).

§ 57-1-309.
Bonds; payment of principal and interest; details.

The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under Section 57-1-307 shall be payable in the manner provided in this section. Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-311.
Bonds; execution.

The bonds authorized by Section 57-1-307 shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear. However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-313.
Bonds; negotiability.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this chapter, the State Bond Commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-315.
Bonds; issuance and sale; redemption.

The State Bond Commission shall act as issuing agent for the bonds authorized under Section 57-1-307, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. The State Bond Commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds. The State Bond Commission may sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually.

If such bonds are sold by sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, selected by the commission.

The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 8; Laws, 2009, ch. 557, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 17, 2009.).

§ 57-1-317.
Bonds; general obligations of state.

The bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged. If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-319.
Bonds; disposition of proceeds of sale.

Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335, the State Bond Commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the special fund created in Section 57-1-303. The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed solely upon the order of the Department of Economic and Community Development under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-321.
Bonds; conditions for issuance.

The bonds authorized under Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335. Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-323.
Bonds; validation.

The bonds authorized under the authority of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-325.
Bonds; protection and enforcement of rights of holders.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-327.
Bonds; legal investments and legal securities.

All bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-329.
Bonds; exemption from taxation.

Bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-331.
Bonds; use of proceeds.

The proceeds of the bonds issued under Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 shall be used solely for the purposes herein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-333.
Bonds; issuance of warrants for payment.

The State Treasurer is authorized to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).

§ 57-1-335.
Construction of Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335.

Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers herein granted, but Sections 57-1-307 through 57-1-335 shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 570, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved April 7, 1994).